Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1255.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 1, chapter 3, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 1-323, to read: START_STATUTE1-323. Arizona jazz day A. April 30, in each year, shall be observed as Arizona jazz day. B. Arizona jazz day is not a legal holiday. END_STATUTE